dictsource/hi_rules
.group ट
        ट          t.V
        _L23) ट (L21L20_         t.       // generated
        _L23) ट (L21L20          t.       // generated
        _L22L23) ट (L21L20_      t.       // generated
        _L22L23) ट (L21L20       t.       // generated
        L23) ट (L21L20_          t.       // generated
        L23) ट (L21L20           t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (L21्_           t.@4     // generated
        _L22) ट (L21्            t.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ट (L21्_        t.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ट (L21्         t.@4     // generated
        L22) ट (L21्_            t.@4     // generated
        L22) ट (L21्             t.@4     // generated
        _L20) ट (L21L22्         t.       // generated
        _L22L20) ट (L21L22्      t.       // generated
        L20) ट (L21L22्          t.       // generated
        _्) ट (L21_              t.@4     // generated
        _्) ट (L21L22_           t.@4     // generated
        _्) ट (L21               t.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ट (L21_           t.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ट (L21L22_        t.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ट (L21            t.@4     // generated
        ्) ट (L21_               t.@4     // generated
        ्) ट (L21L22_            t.@4     // generated
        ्) ट (L21                t.@4     // generated
        _L22) ट (L23_            t.@4     // generated
        _L22) ट (L23L22_         t.@4     // generated
        _L22) ट (L23             t.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ट (L23_         t.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ट (L23L22_      t.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ट (L23          t.@4     // generated
        L22) ट (L23_             t.@4     // generated
        L22) ट (L23L22_          t.@4     // generated
        L22) ट (L23              t.@4     // generated
        _L21) ट (L21L22ड         t.       // generated
        _ां) ट (L21_             t.@4     // generated
        _ां) ट (L21L22_          t.@4     // generated
        _ां) ट (L21              t.@4     // generated
        ां) ट (L21_              t.@4     // generated
        ां) ट (L21L22_           t.@4     // generated
        ां) ट (L21               t.@4     // generated
        _L21) ट (L21L22्         t.       // generated
        _L22L21) ट (L21L22्      t.       // generated
        L21) ट (L21L22्          t.       // generated
        _L20) ट (L21L23_         t.       // generated
        _L20) ट (L21L23          t.       // generated
        _L22L20) ट (L21L23_      t.       // generated
        _L22L20) ट (L21L23       t.       // generated
        L20) ट (L21L23_          t.       // generated
        L20) ट (L21L23           t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (पL22_           t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (पL22            t.       // generated
        _L21) ट (L21L23_         t.       // generated
        _L21) ट (L21L23          t.       // generated
        _L22L21) ट (L21L23_      t.       // generated
        _L22L21) ट (L21L23       t.       // generated
        L21) ट (L21L23_          t.       // generated
        L21) ट (L21L23           t.       // generated
        _L20) ट (L21L22्         t.       // generated
        _L22L20) ट (L21L22्      t.       // generated
        L20) ट (L21L22्          t.       // generated
        टँ         t.V~        // + candrabindu
        ट (_       t.
        ट (B       t.
        ट (्य      t.:

        ट्ट          t.:V    // t.t. -> t.:
        ट्ट (_       t.:
        ट्ट (B       t.:

        ट्ठ          t.#:V    // t.t.# -> t.#:
        ट्ठ (_       t.#:
        ट्ठ (B       t.#:

.group ठ
        ठ          t.#V
        _L23) ठ (L21L20_         t.#      // generated
        _L23) ठ (L21L20          t.#      // generated
        _L22L23) ठ (L21L20_      t.#      // generated
        _L22L23) ठ (L21L20       t.#      // generated
        L23) ठ (L21L20_          t.#      // generated
        L23) ठ (L21L20           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21्_           t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21्            t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L21्_        t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L21्         t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L21्_            t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L21्             t.#@4    // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L22्         t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L22्      t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L22्          t.#      // generated
        _्) ठ (L21_              t.#@4    // generated
        _्) ठ (L21L22_           t.#@4    // generated
        _्) ठ (L21               t.#@4    // generated
        _L22्) ठ (L21_           t.#@4    // generated
        _L22्) ठ (L21L22_        t.#@4    // generated
        _L22्) ठ (L21            t.#@4    // generated
        ्) ठ (L21_               t.#@4    // generated
        ्) ठ (L21L22_            t.#@4    // generated
        ्) ठ (L21                t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L23_            t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L23L22_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22) ठ (L23             t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L23_         t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L23L22_      t.#@4    // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (L23          t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L23_             t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L23L22_          t.#@4    // generated
        L22) ठ (L23              t.#@4    // generated
        _L21) ठ (L21L22ड         t.#      // generated
        _ां) ठ (L21_             t.#@4    // generated
        _ां) ठ (L21L22_          t.#@4    // generated
        _ां) ठ (L21              t.#@4    // generated
        ां) ठ (L21_              t.#@4    // generated
        ां) ठ (L21L22_           t.#@4    // generated
        ां) ठ (L21               t.#@4    // generated
        _L21) ठ (L21L22्         t.#      // generated
        _L22L21) ठ (L21L22्      t.#      // generated
        L21) ठ (L21L22्          t.#      // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L23_         t.#      // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L23          t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L23_      t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L23       t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L23_          t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L23           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (पL22_           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (पL22            t.#      // generated
        _L21) ठ (L21L23_         t.#      // generated
        _L21) ठ (L21L23          t.#      // generated
        _L22L21) ठ (L21L23_      t.#      // generated
        _L22L21) ठ (L21L23       t.#      // generated
        L21) ठ (L21L23_          t.#      // generated
        L21) ठ (L21L23           t.#      // generated
        _L20) ठ (L21L22्         t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ठ (L21L22्      t.#      // generated
        L20) ठ (L21L22्          t.#      // generated
        ठँ         t.#V~        // + candrabindu
        ठ (_       t.#
        ठ (B       t.#
        
        ठ्ठ          t.#:V   // t.#t.# -> t.#:
        ठ्ठ (_       t.#:
        ठ्ठ (B       t.#:
        
.group ड
        ड          d.V
        _L23) ड (L21L20_         d.       // generated
        _L23) ड (L21L20          d.       // generated
        _L22L23) ड (L21L20_      d.       // generated
        _L22L23) ड (L21L20       d.       // generated
        L23) ड (L21L20_          d.       // generated
        L23) ड (L21L20           d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (L21्_           d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L21्            d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L21्_        d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L21्         d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L21्_            d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L21्             d.@4     // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L22्         d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L22्      d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L22्          d.       // generated
        _्) ड (L21_              d.@4     // generated
        _्) ड (L21L22_           d.@4     // generated
        _्) ड (L21               d.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ड (L21_           d.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ड (L21L22_        d.@4     // generated
        _L22्) ड (L21            d.@4     // generated
        ्) ड (L21_               d.@4     // generated
        ्) ड (L21L22_            d.@4     // generated
        ्) ड (L21                d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L23_            d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L23L22_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22) ड (L23             d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L23_         d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L23L22_      d.@4     // generated
        _L22L22) ड (L23          d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L23_             d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L23L22_          d.@4     // generated
        L22) ड (L23              d.@4     // generated
        _L21) ड (L21L22ड         d.       // generated
        _ां) ड (L21_             d.@4     // generated
        _ां) ड (L21L22_          d.@4     // generated
        _ां) ड (L21              d.@4     // generated
        ां) ड (L21_              d.@4     // generated
        ां) ड (L21L22_           d.@4     // generated
        ां) ड (L21               d.@4     // generated
        _L21) ड (L21L22्         d.       // generated
        _L22L21) ड (L21L22्      d.       // generated
        L21) ड (L21L22्          d.       // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L23_         d.       // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L23          d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L23_      d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L23       d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L23_          d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L23           d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (पL22_           d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (पL22            d.       // generated
        _L21) ड (L21L23_         d.       // generated
        _L21) ड (L21L23          d.       // generated
        _L22L21) ड (L21L23_      d.       // generated
        _L22L21) ड (L21L23       d.       // generated
        L21) ड (L21L23_          d.       // generated
        L21) ड (L21L23           d.       // generated
        _L20) ड (L21L22्         d.       // generated
        _L22L20) ड (L21L22्      d.       // generated
        L20) ड (L21L22्          d.       // generated
        डँ         d.V~        // + candrabindu
        ड (_       d.
        ड (B       d.

        ड्ड          d.:V   // d. d. -> d.:
        ड्ड (_       d.:
        ड्ड (B      d.:

        ड्ढ          d.#:V    // d#d# -> d#:
        ड्ढ (_       d.#:
        ड्ढ (B       d.#:


        ड़         r.V
        ड़ (_       r.
        ड़ (B      r.
